Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-106
License issued by county clerk; contents; marriage record; forms.

When an application is made for a license to the county clerk, he or she shall, upon the granting of such license, state in the license the information contained in the application as provided in section 42-104. The license shall, prior to the issuing thereof, be entered of record in the office of the county clerk in a suitable book to be provided for that purpose.

The forms for the application, license, and certificate of marriage shall be provided by the Department of Health and Human Services at actual cost as determined by the department.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 6, p. 254;

Laws 1869, § 1, p. 167;

R.S.1913, § 1545;

C.S.1922, § 1494;

C.S.1929, § 42-106;

R.S.1943, § 42-106;

Laws 1971, LB 728, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 96;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 55.

Fee for proceedings, see section 33-110.